California statutes. Public Utilities Code
======================================================================
  Public Utilities Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: September 26, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

GENERAL PROVISIONS

1.

This act shall be known as the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2.

The provisions of this code, insofar as they are substantially the same as existing statutory provisions relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof, and not as new enactments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

No action or proceeding commenced before this code takes effect, and no right accrued, is affected by this code, but all procedure thereafter taken therein shall conform to the provisions of this code so far as possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

Unless the provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions, rules of construction, and other general provisions contained in Sections 1 to 22, inclusive, and the definitions in the Public Utilities Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 201) of Part 1 of Division 1), shall govern the construction of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

Division, part, chapter, article, and section headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Whenever a power is granted to, or a duty is imposed upon, a public officer, the power may be exercised or the duty may be performed by a deputy of the officer or by a person authorized, pursuant to law, by the officer, unless this code expressly provides otherwise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

Writing includes any form of recorded message capable of comprehension by ordinary visual means. Whenever any notice, report, statement, petition, or record is required or authorized by this code, it shall be made in writing in the English language unless it is expressly provided otherwise.

Wherever any notice or other communication is required by this code to be mailed by registered mail by or to any person or corporation, the mailing of such notice or other communication by certified mail shall be deemed to be a sufficient compliance with the requirements of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

Whenever reference is made to any portion of this code or of any other law of this State, the reference applies to all amendments and additions heretofore or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

“Section” means a section of this code unless some other statute is specifically mentioned. “Subdivision” means a subdivision of the section in which that term occurs unless some other section is expressly mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses, and the future, the present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

The masculine gender includes the feminine and the neuter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12.2.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 93.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

The singular number includes the plural, and the plural, the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

15.

“Oath” includes affirmation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

16.

“Signature” or “subscription” includes mark when the signer or subscriber cannot write, such signer’s or subscriber’s name being written near the mark by a witness who writes his own name near the signer’s or subscriber’s name; but a signature or subscription by mark can be acknowledged or can serve as a signature or subscription to a sworn statement only when two witnesses so sign their own names thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

“State” means the State of California, unless applied to the different parts of the United States. In the latter case, it includes the District of Columbia and the territories.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

“County” includes city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

“City” includes city and county and “incorporated town,” but does not include “unincorporated town” or “village.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

20.

(a) “Commission” means the Public Utilities Commission created by Section 1 of Article XII of the California Constitution, and “commissioner” means a member of the commission.

(b) “Energy Commission” means the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

20.5.

For the purposes of this code, “recycled water” or “reclaimed water” has the same meaning as recycled water as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 13050 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 9.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

If any provision of this code, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the code, or the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

22.

No corporation formed or existing before 12 o'clock m. of January 1, 1873, is affected by the provisions of Division 4 of this code unless the corporation has elected to continue its existence under the provisions of the Civil Code repealed by this code, or elects to continue its existence under this code, but the laws under which such corporations were formed and exist continue to apply to all such corporations, notwithstanding their repeal by this code or prior to its enactment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. REGULATION OF PUBLIC UTILITIES [201. - 3299.100.]



PART 1. PUBLIC UTILITIES ACT [201. - 2120.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [201. - 248.]

201.

This part may be cited as the “Public Utilities Act.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

202.

Neither this part nor any provision thereof, except when specifically so stated, shall apply to commerce with foreign nations or to interstate commerce, except insofar as such application is permitted under the Constitution and laws of the United States; but with reference to passenger stage corporations operating in interstate commerce between any point within this State and any point in any other state or in any foreign nation, the commission may prescribe such reasonable, uniform and nondiscriminatory rules in the interest and aid of public health, security, convenience, and general welfare as, in its opinion, are required by public convenience and necessity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2148.)
-------------------------------------------

203.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

204.

“Corporation” includes a corporation, a company, an association, and a joint stock association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

205.

“Person” includes an individual, a firm, and a copartnership.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

206.

As used in this chapter “person” and “corporation” include the lessees, trustees, receivers or trustees appointed by any court whatsoever, of the person or corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

207.

“Public or any portion thereof” means the public generally, or any limited portion of the public, including a person, private corporation, municipality, or other political subdivision of the State, for which the service is performed or to which the commodity is delivered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

208.

“Transportation of persons” includes every service in connection with or incidental to the safety, comfort, or convenience of the person transported and the receipt, carriage, and delivery of such person and his baggage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

209.

“Transportation of property” includes every service in connection with or incidental to the transportation of property, including in particular its receipt, delivery, elevation, transfer, switching, carriage, ventilation, refrigeration, icing, dunnage, storage, and handling, and the transmission of credit by express corporations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

210.

“Rates” includes rates, fares, tolls, rentals, and charges, unless the context indicates otherwise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

211.

“Common carrier” means every person and corporation providing transportation for compensation to or for the public or any portion thereof, except as otherwise provided in this part.

“Common carrier” includes:

(a) Every railroad corporation; street railroad corporation; dispatch, sleeping car, dining car, drawing-room car, freight, freightline, refrigerator, oil, stock, fruit, car-loaning, car-renting, car-loading, and every other car corporation or person operating for compensation within this state.

(b) Every corporation or person, owning, controlling, operating, or managing any vessel used in the transportation of persons or property for compensation between points upon the inland waters of this state or upon the high seas between points within this state, except as provided in Section 212. “Inland waters” as used in this section includes all navigable waters within this state other than the high seas.

(c) Every “passenger stage corporation” operating within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

212.

(a) “Common carrier” shall not include:

(1) Any corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any vessel, by reason of the furnishing of water transportation service between points upon the inland waters of this state or upon the high seas between points within this state for affiliated or parent or subsidiary companies or for the products of other corporations or persons engaged in the same industry, if the water transportation service is furnished in tank vessels or barges specially constructed to hold liquids or fluids in bulk and if the service is not furnished to others not engaged in
 the same industry.

(2) Any corporation or person who operates any vessel for the transportation of persons for compensation, between points in this state if one terminus of every trip operated by the corporation or person is within the boundaries of a United States military reservation and is performed under a contract with an agency of the federal government which specifies the terms of service to be provided; and provided that the corporation or person does not perform any service between termini within this state which are outside of a United States military reservation. For the purposes of this subdivision, the conditions of this exemption shall be reviewed by the Public Utilities Commission annually as of the first day of January of each year.

(3) Any corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any recreational conveyance such as a ski lift, ski tow, J-bar, T-bar, chair lift, aerial tramway, or other device or equipment used primarily while participating in winter sports activities.

(4) Any corporation or person furnishing or otherwise providing transportation by horse, mule, or other equine animal for entertainment or recreational purposes.

(5) Any motor carrier of property, as defined in Section 34601 of the Vehicle Code. 

(6) A household mover, as defined in Section 19225.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 11.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

214.5.

With respect to a motor vehicle used in the transportation of passengers for compensation by a passenger stage corporation, “owner” means the corporation or person who is registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles as the owner of the vehicle, or who has a legal right to possession of the vehicle pursuant to a lease or rental agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 7.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

215.

“Between fixed termini or over a regular route” means the termini or route between which, or over which any passenger stage corporation usually or ordinarily operates any passenger stage, even though there may be departures from the termini or route, whether these departures are periodic or irregular.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1556, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

215.6.

“Food products for human consumption” means articles used for human food or drink and articles used as components of any of those articles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1685, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

215.7.

“Nonfood product” means any article, material, substance, or product which is not food.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1685, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

216.

(a) (1) “Public utility” includes every common carrier, toll bridge corporation, pipeline corporation, gas corporation, electrical corporation, telephone corporation, telegraph corporation, water corporation, sewer system corporation, and heat corporation, where the service is performed for, or the commodity is delivered to, the public or any portion thereof.

(2) A provider of last resort, as defined in Section 387, that is providing service pursuant to Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 387) of Chapter 2.3 is a public utility subject to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the commission and the provisions of this part regarding providing that service.

(b) Whenever any
 common carrier, toll bridge corporation, pipeline corporation, gas corporation, electrical corporation, telephone corporation, telegraph corporation, water corporation, sewer system corporation, or heat corporation performs a service for, or delivers a commodity to, the public or any portion thereof for which any compensation or payment whatsoever is received, that common carrier, toll bridge corporation, pipeline corporation, gas corporation, electrical corporation, telephone corporation, telegraph corporation, water corporation, sewer system corporation, or heat corporation, is a public utility subject to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the commission and the provisions of this part.

(c) When any person or corporation performs any service for, or delivers any commodity to, any person, private corporation, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state, that in turn either directly or indirectly, mediately or
 immediately, performs that service for, or delivers that commodity to, the public or any portion thereof, that person or corporation is a public utility subject to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the commission and the provisions of this part.

(d) Ownership or operation of a facility that employs cogeneration technology or produces power from other than a conventional power source or the ownership or operation of a facility which employs landfill gas technology does not make a corporation or person a public utility within the meaning of this section solely because of the ownership or operation of that facility.

(e) Any corporation or person engaged directly or indirectly in developing, producing, transmitting, distributing, delivering, or selling any form of heat derived from geothermal or solar resources or from cogeneration technology to any privately owned or
 publicly owned public utility, or to the public or any portion thereof, is not a public utility within the meaning of this section solely by reason of engaging in any of those activities.

(f) The ownership or operation of a facility that sells compressed natural gas or hydrogen at retail to the public for use only as a motor vehicle fuel, and the selling of compressed natural gas or hydrogen at retail from that facility to the public for use only as a motor vehicle fuel, does not make the corporation or person a public utility within the meaning of this section solely because of that ownership, operation, or sale.

(g) Ownership or operation of a facility that is an exempt wholesale generator, as defined in the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 2005 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 16451(6)), does not make a corporation or person a public utility within the meaning of this section, solely due
 to the ownership or operation of that facility.

(h) The ownership, control, operation, or management of an electric plant used for direct transactions or participation directly or indirectly in direct transactions, as permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 365, sales into a market established and operated by the Independent System Operator or any other wholesale electricity market, or the use or sale as permitted under subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, of Section 218, shall not make a corporation or person a public utility within the meaning of this section solely because of that ownership, participation, or sale.

(i) The ownership, control, operation, or management of a facility that supplies electricity to the public only for use to charge light duty plug-in electric vehicles does not make the corporation or person a public utility within the meaning of this section solely
 because of that ownership, control, operation, or management. For purposes of this subdivision, “light duty plug-in electric vehicles” includes light duty battery electric and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles. This subdivision does not affect the commission’s authority under Section 454 or 740.2 or any other applicable statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 245.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

216.2.

Notwithstanding Section 216, “public utility” does not include a motor carrier of property.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 216.5 by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

216.4.

“Cable television corporation” shall mean any corporation or firm which transmits television programs by cable to subscribers for a fee.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 215.5 by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

216.6.

“Cogeneration” means the sequential use of energy for the production of electrical and useful thermal energy. The sequence can be thermal use followed by power production or the reverse, subject to the following standards:

(a) At least 5 percent of the facility’s total annual energy output shall be in the form of useful thermal energy.

(b) Where useful thermal energy follows power production, the useful annual power output plus one-half the useful annual thermal energy output equals not less than 42.5 percent of any natural gas and oil energy input.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 218.5 by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

216.8.

“Commercial mobile radio service” means “commercial mobile service,” as defined in subsection (d) of Section 332 of Title 47 of the United States Code and as further specified by the Federal Communications Commission in Parts 20, 22, 24, and 25 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and includes “mobile data service,” “mobile paging service,” “mobile satellite telephone service,” and “mobile telephony service,” as those terms are defined in Section 224.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

217.

“Electric plant” includes all real estate, fixtures and personal property owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate the production, generation, transmission, delivery, or furnishing of electricity for light, heat, or power, and all conduits, ducts, or other devices, materials, apparatus, or property for containing, holding, or carrying conductors used or to be used for the transmission of electricity for light, heat, or power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

218.

(a) “Electrical corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any electric plant for compensation within this state, except where electricity is generated on or distributed by the producer through private property solely for its own use or the use of its tenants and not for sale or transmission to others.

(b) “Electrical corporation” does not include a corporation or person employing cogeneration technology or producing power from other than a conventional power source for the generation of electricity solely for any one or more of the following purposes:

(1) Its own use or the use of its tenants.

(2) The use of or sale to not more than two other corporations or persons solely for use on the real property on which the electricity is generated or on real property immediately adjacent thereto, unless there is an intervening public street constituting the boundary between the real property on which the electricity is generated and the immediately adjacent property and one or more of the following applies:

(A) The real property on which the electricity is generated and the immediately adjacent real property is not under common ownership or control, or that common ownership or control was gained solely for purposes of sale of the electricity so generated and not for other business purposes.

(B) The useful thermal output of the facility generating the electricity is not used on the immediately adjacent property for petroleum production or refining.

(C) The electricity furnished to the immediately adjacent property is not utilized by a subsidiary or affiliate of the corporation or person generating the electricity.

(3) Sale or transmission to an electrical corporation or state or local public agency, but not for sale or transmission to others, unless the corporation or person is otherwise an electrical corporation.

(c) “Electrical corporation” does not include a corporation or person employing landfill gas technology for the generation of electricity for any one or more of the following purposes:

(1) Its own use or the use of not more than two of its tenants located on the real property on which the electricity is generated.

(2) The use of or sale to not more than two other corporations or persons solely for use on the real property on which the electricity is generated.

(3) Sale or transmission to an electrical corporation or state or local public agency.

(d) “Electrical corporation” does not include a corporation or person employing digester gas technology for the generation of electricity for any one or more of the following purposes:

(1) Its own use or the use of not more than two of its tenants located on the real property on which the electricity is generated.

(2) The use of or sale to not more than two other corporations or persons solely for use on the real property on which the electricity is generated.

(3) Sale or transmission to an electrical corporation or state or local public agency, if the sale or transmission of the electricity service to a retail customer is provided through the transmission system of the existing local publicly owned electric utility or electrical corporation of that retail customer.

(e) “Electrical corporation” does not include an independent solar energy producer, as defined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 2868) of Chapter 9 of Part 2.

(f) The amendments made to this section at the 1987 portion of the 1987–88 Regular Session of the Legislature do not apply to any corporation or person employing cogeneration technology or producing power from other than a conventional power source for the generation of electricity that physically produced electricity prior to January 1, 1989, and furnished that electricity to immediately adjacent real property for use thereon prior to January 1, 1989.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 535, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

218.3.

(a) “Electric service provider” means an entity that offers electrical service to customers within the service territory of an electrical corporation and includes the unregulated affiliates and subsidiaries of an electrical corporation.

(b) “Electric service provider” does not include an entity that offers electrical service solely to service customer load consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 218, and does not include an electrical corporation or a public agency that offers electrical service to residential and small commercial customers within its jurisdiction, or within the service territory of a local publicly owned electric utility.

(c) “Electric service provider” does not include an independent solar energy producer, as defined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 2868) of Chapter 9 of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 535, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

218.5.

(a) The following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Exempt wholesale generator” has the same meaning as defined in the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 2005 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 16451(6)).

(2) “Qualifying small power producer,” “small power production facility,” and “qualifying small power production facility” have the same meanings as found in Section 796 of Title 16 of the United States Code and the regulations enacted pursuant thereto.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a qualifying small power producer owning or operating a small power production facility is not a public utility subject to the general jurisdiction of the commission solely because of the ownership or operation of the facility.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an exempt wholesale generator is not a public utility subject to the general jurisdiction of the commission solely due to the ownership or operation of the facility.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 228.5 by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

219.

“Express corporation” includes every corporation or person engaged in or transacting the business of transporting any freight, merchandise, or other property for compensation on the line of any common carrier or stage or auto stage line within this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

220.

“Freight forwarder” means any corporation or person who for compensation undertakes the collection and shipment of property of others, and as consignor or otherwise ships or arranges to ship the property via the line of any common carrier at the tariff rates of such carrier, or who receives such property as consignee thereof.

This section shall not apply to any agricultural or horticultural cooperative organization operating under and by virtue of the laws of this or any other state or the District of Columbia or under federal statute in the performance of its duties for its members, or the agents, individual or corporate, of such organization in the performance of their duties as agents.

This section shall not apply to the operation of a shipper, or a group or association of shippers, in consolidating or distributing freight for themselves or for the members thereof, on a nonprofit basis, for the purpose of securing the benefits of carload, truckload, or other volume rates, or to the operations of a shippers’ agent, in consolidating or distributing pool cars, whose services and responsibilities to shippers in connection with such operations are confined to the terminal area in which such operations are performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1063, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

221.

“Gas plant” includes all real estate, fixtures, and personal property, owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate the production, generation, transmission, delivery, underground storage, or furnishing of gas, natural or manufactured, except propane, for light, heat, or power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 512.)
-------------------------------------------

222.

“Gas corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any gas plant for compensation within this state, except where gas is made or produced on and distributed by the maker or producer through private property alone solely for his own use or the use of his tenants and not for sale to others.

“Gas corporation” shall not include a corporation or person employing landfill gas technology for the production of gas for its own use or the use of its tenants or for sale to a gas corporation or state or local public agency, except that if the gas produced is of such insufficient quality or heating value that it is unacceptable for introduction into the line, plant, or system of a gas corporation or state or local public agency, the person or corporation employing landfill gas technology may without becoming a gas corporation for purposes of this part sell the gas so produced to not more than four other corporations or persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 214, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

222.5.

“Golden State Energy” means the nonprofit public benefit corporation that is incorporated and operating pursuant to Division 1.7 (commencing with Section 3400).

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 5.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

223.

“Heating plant” includes all real estate, fixtures, and personal property owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate the production, generation, transmission, delivery or furnishing of heat for domestic, business, industrial, or public use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

224.

“Heat corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any heating plant for compensation within this state, except where heat is generated on or distributed by the producer through private property alone solely for his own use or the use of his tenants and not for sale to others.

“Heat corporation” shall not include a corporation or person employing landfill gas technology for the production or generation of heat for its own use or the use of its tenants or for sale to a heat corporation or state or local public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 214, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

224.2.

“Landfill gas technology” means the process of extraction of gas or gaseous compounds from sanitary landfill areas which gas or compound was generated as a byproduct of the materials composing the landfill. For purposes of this division, real estate, fixtures, and personal property including gas extraction wells, engines and compressors for gas removal or storage, gas cleaning or rectifying equipment, equipment for the generation or production of steam, electricity, heat, or other form of energy through the use of landfill gas, and facilities for the transmission or distribution of landfill gas or other form of energy generated or produced therefrom shall not be considered an electrical, gas, or heat plant or pipeline.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 224.5 by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

224.3.

“Local publicly owned electric utility” means a municipality or municipal corporation operating as a “public utility” furnishing electric service as provided in Section 10001, a municipal utility district furnishing electric service formed pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 11501), a public utility district furnishing electric services formed pursuant to the Public Utility District Act set forth in Division 7 (commencing with Section 15501), an irrigation district furnishing electric services formed pursuant to the Irrigation District Law set forth in Division 11 (commencing with Section 20500) of the Water Code, or a joint powers authority that includes one or more of these agencies and that owns generation or transmission facilities, or furnishes electric services over its own or its member’s electric distribution system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

224.4.

(a) “Mobile data service” means the delivery of nonvoice information to a mobile device and includes nonvoice information communicated to a mobile telephony services handset, nonvoice information communicated to handheld personal digital assistant (PDA) devices and laptop computers, and mobile paging service carriers offering services on pagers and two-way messaging devices. Unless specified, “mobile data service” does not include nonvoice information communicated through a wireless local area network operating in the unlicensed radio bands, commonly known as a “Wi-Fi” network.

(b) “Mobile paging service” means the transmission of coded radio signals for the purpose of activating specific small radio receivers designed to be carried by a person and to give an aural, visual, or tactile indication when activated.

(c) “Mobile satellite telephone service” means voice communication to end users over a mobile satellite service involving the provision of commercial mobile radio service, pursuant to Parts 20 and 25 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) “Mobile telephony service” means commercially available interconnected mobile phone services that provide access to the public switched telephone network (PSTN) via mobile communication devices employing radiowave technology to transmit calls, including cellular radiotelephone, broadband Personal Communications Services (PCS), and digital Specialized Mobile Radio (SMR). “Mobile telephony services” does not include mobile satellite telephone services or mobile data services used exclusively for the delivery of nonvoice information to a mobile device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

224.6.

“Motor carrier of property” means a motor carrier of property as defined in Section 34601 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 10.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

224.8.

“Network railroad transportation” means railroad transportation that is subject to the jurisdiction of the federal Surface Transportation Board pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of Section 10501 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

225.

“Passenger stage” includes every stage, auto stage, or other motor vehicle used in the transportation of persons, or persons and their baggage or express, or persons or baggage or express, when such baggage or express is transported incidental to the transportation of passengers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

226.

(a) “Passenger stage corporation” includes every corporation or person engaged as a common carrier, for compensation, in the ownership, control, operation, or management of any passenger stage over any public highway in this state between fixed termini or over a regular route except those, 98 percent or more of whose operations as measured by total route mileage operated, which are exclusively within the limits of a single city or city and county, or whose operations consist solely in the transportation of bona fide pupils attending an institution of learning between their homes and that institution.

For purposes of this section, the percentage of the route mileage within the limits of any city shall be determined by the Public Utilities Commission on the first day of January of each year, and the percentage so determined shall be presumed to continue for the year.

(b) “Passenger stage corporation” does not include that part of the operations of any corporation or person engaged in the ownership, control, operation, or management of any passenger stage over any public highway in this state, whether between fixed termini or over a regular route or otherwise, engaged in the transportation of any pupils or students to and from a public or private school, college, or university, or to and from activities of a public or private school, college, or university, where the rate, charge, or fare for that transportation is not computed, collected, or demanded on an individual fare basis.
